Wisconsin, session 2025, AB694.
do enact as follows:AB694,11Section 1. 23.09 (2) (d) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,2,8223.09 (2) (d) Lands, acquisition. (intro.) Acquire by purchase, lease or 3agreement, and receive by gifts or devise, lands or waters suitable for the purposes 4enumerated in this paragraph, and maintain such lands and waters for such 5purposes; and, except for the purpose specified under subd. 12., may condemn lands 6or waters suitable for such purposes after obtaining approval of the appropriate 7standing committees of each house of the legislature as determined by the presiding 8officer thereof:AB694,29Section 2. 27.01 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,2,161027.01 (2) (a) Acquire by purchase, lease or agreement lands or waters suitable 11for state park purposes and may acquire such lands and waters by condemnation 12after obtaining approval of the senate and assembly committees on natural 13resources. The power of condemnation may not be used for the purpose of 14establishing or extending a recreational trail; a bicycle way, as defined in s. 340.01 15(5s); a bicycle lane, as defined in s. 340.01 (5e); or a pedestrian way, as defined in s. 16346.02 (8) (a).AB694,317Section 3. 27.019 (10) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,3,51827.019 (10) Acquisition of land. Any county in which there does not exist a 19county park commission acting through its rural planning committee may acquire 20by gift, grant, devise, donation, purchase, condemnation or otherwise, with the 21consent of the county board, a sufficient tract or tracts of land for the reservation for 22public use of river fronts, lake shores, picnic groves, outlook points from hilltops, 23places of special historic interest, memorial grounds, parks, playgrounds, sites for 1public buildings, and reservations in and about and along and leading to any or all 2of the same, and to develop and maintain the same for public use. The power of 3condemnation may not be used for the purpose of establishing or extending a 4recreational trail; a bicycle way, as defined in s. 340.01 (5s); a bicycle lane, as 5defined in s. 340.01 (5e); or a pedestrian way, as defined in s. 346.02 (8) (a).AB694,46Section 4. 27.05 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,3,16727.05 (3) Acquire, in the name of the county, by purchase, land contract, lease, 8condemnation, or otherwise, with the approval and consent of the county board, 9such tracts of land or public ways as it deems suitable for park purposes; including 10lands in any other county not more than three-fourths of a mile from the county 11line; but no land so acquired shall be disposed of by the county without the consent 12of said commission, and all moneys received for any such lands, or any materials, so 13disposed of, shall be paid into the county park fund hereinafter established. The 14power of condemnation may not be used for the purpose of establishing or extending 15a recreational trail; a bicycle way, as defined in s. 340.01 (5s); a bicycle lane, as 16defined in s. 340.01 (5e); or a pedestrian way, as defined in s. 346.02 (8) (a).AB694,517Section 5. 27.065 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,4,121827.065 (1) (a) The county board of any county which shall have adopted a 19county system of parks or a county system of streets and parkways, pursuant to s. 2027.04, may acquire the lands necessary for carrying out all or part of such plan by 21gift, purchase, condemnation or otherwise; provided, however, that no lands shall 22be acquired by condemnation unless and until the common council of the city or the 23board of trustees of the village or the board of supervisors of the town wherein such 1land is situated shall consent thereto. The power of condemnation may not be used 2for the purpose of establishing or extending a recreational trail; a bicycle way, as 3defined in s. 340.01 (5s); a bicycle lane, as defined in s. 340.01 (5e); or a pedestrian 4way, as defined in s. 346.02 (8) (a). The cost of acquiring such lands by purchase or 5condemnation may be paid in whole or in part by the county or by the property to be 6benefited thereby, as the county board shall direct but in no case shall the amount 7assessed to any parcel of real estate exceed the benefits accruing thereto; provided, 8that no assessment for paying the cost of acquiring lands may be levied or collected 9against the property to be benefited until the governing body of the city, village or 10town where such lands are located has by resolution determined that the public 11welfare will be promoted thereby. Title to all lands acquired hereunder shall be an 12estate in fee simple.AB694,613Section 6. 27.08 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,5,41427.08 (2) (b) To acquire in the name of the city for park, parkway, boulevard or 15pleasure drive purposes by gift, devise, bequest or condemnation, either absolutely 16or in trust, money, real or personal property, or any incorporeal right or privilege; 17except that no lands may be acquired by condemnation for the purpose of 18establishing or extending a recreational trail; a bicycle way, as defined in s. 340.01 19(5s); a bicycle lane, as defined in s. 340.01 (5e); or a pedestrian way, as defined in s. 20346.02 (8) (a). Gifts to any city of money or other property, real or personal, either 21absolutely or in trust, for park, parkway, boulevard or pleasure drive purposes shall 22be accepted only after they shall have been recommended by the board to the 23common council and approved by said council by resolution. Subject to the approval 1of the common council the board may execute every trust imposed upon the use of 2property or property rights by the deed, testament or other conveyance transferring 3the title of such property to the city for park, parkway, boulevard or pleasure drive 4purposes.AB694,75Section 7. 27.08 (2) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,5,16627.08 (2) (c) Subject to the approval of the common council to buy or lease 7lands in the name of the city for park, parkway, boulevard or pleasure drive 8purposes within or without the city and, with the approval of the common council, 9to sell or exchange property no longer required for its purposes. Every city is 10authorized, upon recommendation of its officers, board or body having the control 11and management of its public parks, to acquire by condemnation in the name of the 12city such lands within or without its corporate boundaries as it may need for public 13parks, parkways, boulevards and pleasure drives. The power of condemnation may 14not be used for the purpose of establishing or extending a recreational trail; a 15bicycle way, as defined in s. 340.01 (5s); a bicycle lane, as defined in s. 340.01 (5e); or 16a pedestrian way, as defined in s. 346.02 (8) (a).AB694,817Section 8. 32.015 of the statutes is repealed.AB694,918Section 9. 32.51 (1) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,5,211932.51 (1) Purposes. (intro.) In addition to the powers granted under subch. 20I and subject to the limitations under s. 32.015, any city may condemn or otherwise 21acquire property under this subchapter for:AB694,1022Section 10. 59.52 (6) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,6,122359.52 (6) (a) How acquired; purposes. Take and hold land acquired under ch. 175 and acquire, lease or rent property, real and personal, for public uses or purposes 2of any nature, including without limitation acquisitions for county buildings, 3airports, parks, recreation, highways, dam sites in parks, parkways and 4playgrounds, flowages, sewage and waste disposal for county institutions, lime pits 5for operation under s. 59.70 (24), equipment for clearing and draining land and 6controlling weeds for operation under s. 59.70 (18), ambulances, acquisition and 7transfer of real property to the state for new collegiate institutions or research 8facilities, and for transfer to the state for state parks and for the uses and purposes 9specified in s. 23.09 (2) (d). The power of condemnation may not be used to acquire 10property for the purpose of establishing or extending a recreational trail; a bicycle 11way, as defined in s. 340.01 (5s); a bicycle lane, as defined in s. 340.01 (5e); or a 12pedestrian way, as defined in s. 346.02 (8) (a).AB694,1113Section 11. 60.782 (2) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,6,191460.782 (2) (d) Lease or acquire, including by condemnation, any real property 15situated in this state that may be needed for the purposes of s. 23.09 (19), 23.094 16(3g) or 30.275 (4). The power of condemnation may not used to acquire property for 17the purpose of establishing or extending a recreational trail; a bicycle way, as 18defined in s. 340.01 (5s); a bicycle lane, as defined in s. 340.01 (5e); or a pedestrian 19way, as defined in s. 346.02 (8) (a).AB694,1220Section 12. 61.34 (3) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 61.34 (3) and 21amended to read:AB694,7,72261.34 (3) Except as provided in par. (b), the The village board may acquire 23property, real or personal, within or outside the village, for parks, libraries, 1recreation, beautification, streets, water systems, sewage or waste disposal, 2harbors, improvement of watercourses, public grounds, vehicle parking areas, and 3for any other public purpose; may acquire real property within or contiguous to the 4village, by means other than condemnation, for industrial sites; may improve and 5beautify the same; may construct, own, lease and maintain buildings on such 6property for instruction, recreation, amusement and other public purposes; and 7may sell and convey such property. Condemnation shall be as provided by ch. 32.AB694,138Section 13. 61.34 (3) (b) of the statutes is repealed.AB694,149Section 14. 62.22 (1) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 62.22 (1) and 10amended to read:AB694,7,191162.22 (1) Except as provided in par. (b), the The governing body of any city 12may by gift, purchase or condemnation acquire property, real or personal, within or 13outside the city, for parks, recreation, water systems, sewage or waste disposal, 14airports or approaches thereto, cemeteries, vehicle parking areas, and for any other 15public purpose; may acquire real property within or contiguous to the city, by 16means other than condemnation, for industrial sites; may improve and beautify the 17same; may construct, own, lease and maintain buildings on such property for public 18purposes; and may sell and convey such property. The power of condemnation for 19any such purpose shall be as provided by ch. 32.AB694,1520Section 15. 62.22 (1) (b) of the statutes is repealed.AB694,1621Section 16. 62.23 (17) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,8,52262.23 (17) (a) (intro.) Except as provided in par. (am), cities Cities may acquire 23by gift, lease, purchase, or condemnation any lands within its corporate limits for 1establishing, laying out, widening, enlarging, extending, and maintaining 2memorial grounds, streets, squares, parkways, boulevards, parks, playgrounds, 3sites for public buildings, and reservations in and about and along and leading to 4any or all of the same or any lands adjoining or near to such city for use, sublease, or 5sale for any of the following purposes:AB694,176Section 17. 62.23 (17) (am) of the statutes is repealed.AB694,187Section 18. 85.09 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,9,15885.09 (2) (a) The department of transportation shall have the first right to 9acquire, for present or future transportational or recreational purposes, any 10property used in operating a railroad or railway, including land and rails, ties, 11switches, trestles, bridges, and the like located on that property, that has been 12abandoned. The department of transportation may, in connection with abandoned 13rail property, assign this right to a state agency, the board of regents of the 14University of Wisconsin System, any county or municipality, or any transit 15commission. Acquisition by the department of transportation may be by gift, 16purchase, or condemnation in accordance with the procedure under s. 32.05, except 17that the power of condemnation may not be used to acquire property for the purpose 18of establishing or extending a recreational trail; a bicycle way, as defined in s. 19340.01 (5s); a bicycle lane, as defined in s. 340.01 (5e); or a pedestrian way, as 20defined in s. 346.02 (8) (a). In addition to its property management authority under 21s. 85.15, the department of transportation may, subject to any prior action under s. 2213.48 (14) (am) or 16.848 (1), lease and collect rents and fees for any use of rail 23property pending discharge of the department’s duty to convey property that is not 1necessary for a public purpose. No person owning abandoned rail property, 2including any person to whom ownership reverts upon abandonment, may convey or 3dispose of any abandoned rail property without first obtaining a written release 4from the department of transportation indicating that the first right of acquisition 5under this subsection will not be exercised or assigned. No railroad or railway may 6convey any rail property prior to abandonment if the rail property is part of a rail 7line shown on the railroad’s system map as in the process of abandonment, expected 8to be abandoned, or under study for possible abandonment unless the conveyance or 9disposal is for the purpose of providing continued rail service under another 10company or agency. Any conveyance made without obtaining such release is void. 11The first right of acquisition of the department of transportation under this 12subsection does not apply to any rail property declared by the department to be 13abandoned before January 1, 1977. The department of transportation may acquire 14any abandoned rail property under this section regardless of the date of its 15abandonment.AB694,1916Section 19. 990.01 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB694,9,2017990.01 (2) Acquire. “Acquire,” when used in connection with a grant of power 18to any person, includes the acquisition by purchase, grant, gift or bequest. It 19includes the power to condemn only in the cases specified in s. 32.02 and subject to 20the limitations under s. 32.015.AB694,2021Section 20. Initial applicability.AB694,9,2222(1) This act first applies to condemnation proceedings in which title to the 1subject property has not vested in the condemnor on the effective date of this 2subsection.AB694,10,33